District of Columbia statutes.
1-821.01

Transition from District of Columbia administration.

Sections 1-805.03 , 1-807.02(b)(2) , 1-807.03(d) , and 1-809.01 shall apply to the administration of the District of Columbia Judges Retirement Fund established under § 1-714, the District of Columbia Judicial Retirement and Survivors Annuity Fund established under § 11-1570, and the retirement program for judges under subchapter III of Chapter 15 of Title 11, except as follows:

(1)

In applying [each such] section:

(A)

Any reference to this chapter shall instead refer to subchapter III of Chapter 15 of Title 11;

(B)

Any reference to the District Retirement Program shall be deemed to include the retirement program for judges under subchapter III of Chapter 15 of Title 11;

(C)

Any reference to the District Retirement Fund shall be deemed to include the District of Columbia Judges Retirement Fund established under § 1-714;

(D)

Any reference to federal benefit payments shall be deemed to include judges retirement pay, annuities, refunds, and allowances under subchapter III of Chapter 15 of Title 11;

(E)

Any reference to the Trust Fund shall instead refer to the District of Columbia Judicial Retirement and Survivors Annuity Fund established under § 11-1570;

(F)

Any reference to § 1-807.03 shall instead refer to § 1-714; and

(G)

Any reference to subchapter II shall instead refer to § 11-1570.

(2)

In applying § 1-805.03:

(A)

Any reference to the contract shall instead refer to the agreement referred to in § 11-1570(b); and

(B)

Any reference to the Trustee shall instead refer to the Trustee or contractor referred to in § 11-1570(b).

(3)

In applying § 1-809.01(d):

(A)

Any reference to this section shall instead refer to § 1-714; and

(B)

Any reference to the Trustee shall instead refer to the Secretary or the Trustee or contractor referred to in § 11-1570(b).

(4)

In applying § 1-765.1(b), any reference to the Trustee shall instead refer to the Trustee or contractor referred to in § 11-1570(b).

History

Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2419, Pub. L. 105-274, § 2(d)(2)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-536, Pub. L. 105-277, § 804(d)(2)

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-819.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-769.21.

Effective Dates

Section 2(d)(3) of Pub. L. 105-274 and § 804(d)(3) of Pub. L. 105-277 provide that § 11252(c) of Pub. L. 105-33, as amended by §§ 2(d)(1) and (e)(3) of Pub. L. 105-274 and §§ 804(d)(1) and (e)(3) of Pub. L. 105-277, shall take effect on the Dates on which the assets of the District of Columbia Judges Retirement Fund are transferred to the District of Columbia Judicial Retirement and Survivors Annuity Fund.